Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2808.01
Calculated expiration date, defined.

Calculated expiration date means the expiration date on the manufacturer's, packager's, or distributor's container or one year from the date the drug or device is repackaged, whichever is earlier.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 31.